Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska1-150
Disciplinary action; additional board powers.

Upon application in writing and after hearing pursuant to notice, the board may issue a new certificate to a certified public accountant whose certificate has been revoked, may permit the reregistration of a person whose registration has been revoked, or may reissue or modify the suspension of any permit which has been revoked or suspended.

Laws 1957, c. 1, § 45, p. 71;

Laws 1997, LB 114, § 40.